Utah statutes.
58-3a-602.    Plans and specifications to be sealed.

(1)  Any final plan and specification of a building erected in this state shall bear the seal of an architect licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Section 58-3a-304, in Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act, and by the State Construction Code or an approved code under Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act.

(2)  Any final plan and specification of a building prepared by or under the supervision of the licensed architect shall bear the seal of the architect when submitted to a client, or when submitted to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit, even if the practice is exempt from licensure under Section 58-3a-304.

